Illinois, session 104th, SB3023.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-7-2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-7-2)7    Sec. 3-7-2. Facilities. 8    (a) All institutions and facilities of the Department 9shall provide every committed person with access to toilet 10facilities, barber facilities, bathing facilities at least 11once each week, a library of legal materials and published 12materials including newspapers and magazines approved by the 13Director. A committed person may not receive any materials 14that the Director deems pornographic.15    (b) (Blank).16    (c) All institutions and facilities of the Department 17shall provide facilities for every committed person to leave 18his cell for at least one hour each day unless the chief 19administrative officer determines that it would be harmful or 20dangerous to the security or safety of the institution or 21facility.22    (d) All institutions and facilities of the Department 23shall provide every committed person with a wholesome and   SB3023- 2 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1nutritional diet at regularly scheduled hours, drinking water, 2clothing adequate for the season, including underwear, 3bedding, soap, towels, and medical and dental care. Underwear 4provided to each committed person in all institutions and 5facilities of the Department shall be free of charge and shall 6be provided at any time upon request, including multiple 7requests, of the committed person or as needed by the 8committed person.9    (e) All institutions and facilities of the Department 10shall permit every committed person to send and receive an 11unlimited number of uncensored letters, provided, however, 12that the Director may order that mail be inspected and read for 13reasons of the security, safety, or morale of the institution 14or facility. All institutions and facilities of the Department 15shall not deny the distribution of original physical mail to 16committed persons after such incoming mail has undergone 17inspection and it has been determined that the mail does not 18pose a threat to the security or safety of the institution or 19facility, personnel of the Department, or committed persons. 20As used in this Section "threat to the security or safety of 21the institution or facility" means any of the following: 22        (1) the letter contains threats of physical harm 23    against any person or threats of criminal activity;24        (2) the letter contains threats of blackmail or 25    extortion;26        (3) the letter contains information regarding sending   SB3023- 3 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1    contraband into or out of the institution or facility, 2    plans to escape, or plans to engage in criminal activity;3        (4) the letter is in code and its contents cannot be 4    understood by correctional staff;5        (5) the letter violates any departmental rules or 6    contains plans to engage in activities in violation of 7    departmental or institutional rules;8        (6) the letter contains unauthorized correspondence 9    with another person who is incarcerated; or10        (7) the letter or contents of the letter constitute a 11    violation of State or federal law. 12    (f) All of the institutions and facilities of the 13Department shall permit every committed person to receive 14in-person visitors and video contact, if available, except in 15case of abuse of the visiting privilege or when the chief 16administrative officer determines that such visiting would be 17harmful or dangerous to the security, safety or morale of the 18institution or facility. Each committed person is entitled to 197 visits per month. Every committed person may submit a list of 20at least 30 persons to the Department that are authorized to 21visit the committed person. The list shall be kept in an 22electronic format by the Department beginning on August 1, 232019, as well as available in paper form for Department 24employees. The chief administrative officer shall have the 25right to restrict visitation to non-contact visits, video, or 26other forms of non-contact visits for reasons of safety,   SB3023- 4 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1security, and order, including, but not limited to, 2restricting contact visits for committed persons engaged in 3gang activity. No committed person in a super maximum security 4facility or on disciplinary segregation is allowed contact 5visits. Any committed person found in possession of illegal 6drugs or who fails a drug test shall not be permitted contact 7visits for a period of at least 6 months. Any committed person 8involved in gang activities or found guilty of assault 9committed against a Department employee shall not be permitted 10contact visits for a period of at least 6 months. The 11Department shall offer every visitor appropriate written 12information concerning HIV and AIDS, including information 13concerning how to contact the Illinois Department of Public 14Health for counseling information. The Department shall 15develop the written materials in consultation with the 16Department of Public Health. The Department shall ensure that 17all such information and materials are culturally sensitive 18and reflect cultural diversity as appropriate. Implementation 19of the changes made to this Section by Public Act 94-629 is 20subject to appropriation. The Department shall seek the lowest 21possible cost to provide video calling and shall charge to the 22extent of recovering any demonstrated costs of providing video 23calling. The Department shall not make a commission or profit 24from video calling services. Nothing in this Section shall be 25construed to permit video calling instead of in-person 26visitation.   SB3023- 5 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1    (f-5) (Blank).2    (f-10) The Department may not restrict or limit in-person 3visits to committed persons due to the availability of 4interactive video conferences.5    (f-15)(1) The Department shall issue a standard written 6policy for each institution and facility of the Department 7that provides for:8        (A) the number of in-person visits each committed 9    person is entitled to per week and per month including the 10    requirements of subsection (f) of this Section;11        (B) the hours of in-person visits;12        (C) the type of identification required for visitors 13    at least 18 years of age; and14        (D) the type of identification, if any, required for 15    visitors under 18 years of age. 16    (2) This policy shall be posted on the Department website 17and at each facility.18    (3) The Department shall post on its website daily any 19restrictions or denials of visitation for that day and the 20succeeding 5 calendar days, including those based on a 21lockdown of the facility, to inform family members and other 22visitors. 23    (g) All institutions and facilities of the Department 24shall permit religious ministrations and sacraments to be 25available to every committed person, but attendance at 26religious services shall not be required. This subsection (g)   SB3023- 6 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1is subject to the provisions of the Faith Behind Bars Act.2    (h) Within 90 days after December 31, 1996, the Department 3shall prohibit the use of curtains, cell-coverings, or any 4other matter or object that obstructs or otherwise impairs the 5line of vision into a committed person's cell.6    (i) A point of contact person appointed under subsection 7(u-6) of Section 3-2-2 of this Code shall promptly and 8efficiently review suggestions, complaints, and other requests 9made by visitors to institutions and facilities of the 10Department and by other members of the public. Based on the 11nature of the submission, the point of contact person shall 12communicate with the appropriate division of the Department, 13disseminate the concern or complaint, and act as liaison 14between the parties to reach a resolution.15        (1) The point of contact person shall maintain 16    information about the subject matter of each 17    correspondence, including, but not limited to, information 18    about the following subjects:19            (A) the parties making the submission;20            (B) any commissary-related concerns;21            (C) any concerns about the institution or 22        facility's COVID-19 protocols and mitigations;23            (D) any concerns about mail, video, or electronic 24        messages or other communications with incarcerated 25        persons;26            (E) any concerns about the institution or   SB3023- 7 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1        facility;2            (F) any discipline-related concerns;3            (G) any concerns about earned sentencing credits;4            (H) any concerns about educational opportunities 5        for incarcerated persons;6            (I) any concerns about health-related matters;7            (J) any mental health concerns;8            (K) any concerns about personal property;9            (L) any concerns about the records of the 10        incarcerated person;11            (M) any concerns about recreational opportunities 12        for incarcerated persons;13            (N) any staffing-related concerns;14            (O) any concerns about the transfer of individuals 15        in custody;16            (P) any concerns about visitation; and17            (Q) any concerns about work opportunities for 18        incarcerated persons.19        The information shall be maintained in accordance with 20    standards set by the Department of Corrections, and shall 21    be made available to the Department's Planning and 22    Research Division. The point of contact person shall 23    provide a summary of the results of the review, including 24    any resolution or recommendations made as a result of 25    correspondence with the Planning and Research Division of 26    the Department.  SB3023- 8 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1        (2) The Department shall provide an annual written 2    report to the General Assembly and the Governor, with the 3    first report due no later than January 1, 2023, and 4    publish the report on its website within 48 hours after 5    the report is transmitted to the Governor and the General 6    Assembly. The report shall include a summary of activities 7    undertaken and completed as a result of submissions to the 8    point of contact person. The Department of Corrections 9    shall collect and report the following aggregated and 10    disaggregated data for each institution and facility and 11    describe:12            (A) the work of the point of contact person;13            (B) the general nature of suggestions, complaints, 14        and other requests submitted to the point of contact 15        person;16            (C) the volume of emails, calls, letters, and 17        other correspondence received by the point of contact 18        person;19            (D) the resolutions reached or recommendations 20        made as a result of the point of contact person's 21        review;22            (E) whether, if an investigation is recommended, a 23        report of the complaint was forwarded to the Chief 24        Inspector of the Department or other Department 25        employee, and the resolution of the complaint, and if 26        the investigation has not concluded, a detailed status   SB3023- 9 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1        report on the complaint; and2            (F) any recommendations that the point of contact 3        person has relating to systemic issues in the 4        Department of Corrections, and any other matters for 5        consideration by the General Assembly and the 6        Governor.7        The name, address, or other personally identifiable 8    information of a person who files a complaint, suggestion, 9    or other request with the point of contact person, and 10    confidential records shall be redacted from the annual 11    report and are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom 12    of Information Act. The Department shall disclose the 13    records only if required by a court order on a showing of 14    good cause.15        (3) The Department must post in a conspicuous place in 16    the waiting area of every facility or institution a sign 17    that contains in bold, black type the following:18            (A) a short statement notifying visitors of the 19        point of contact person and that person's duty to 20        receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests; 21        and22            (B) information on how to submit suggestions, 23        complaints, or other requests to the point of contact 24        person. 25    (j) Menstrual hygiene products shall be available, as 26needed, free of charge, at all institutions and facilities of   SB3023- 10 -LRB104 17673 RLC 31104 b1the Department for all committed persons who menstruate. In 2this subsection (j), "menstrual hygiene products" means 3tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the 4menstrual cycle. 5(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-331, eff. 1-1-24; 6104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)